apertium-lin.lin.lexd
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!                                                                         !!!
#!!                   L I N G A L A   T R A N S D U C E R                   !!!
#!!                                                                         !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

#=============================================================================!
#                         Noun Morphotactics                                  !
#=============================================================================!

PATTERNS
:I-II I-II-Stems I-II:
:Ia-II Ia-II-Stems Ia-II:
:III-IV III-IV-Stems III-IV:
:V-VI V-VI-Stems V-VI:
:VI-Only VI-Only-Stems VI-Only:
:VII-VIII VII-VIII-Stems VII-VIII:
:IX-X IX-X-Stems IX-X:
:IX-X IX-X-a-Stems IX-X:
:IX-X IX-X-b-Stems IX-X:
:IX-X IX-X-Var IX-X-b-Stems IX-X: # Dir/LR
:XI-VI XI-VI-Stems XI-VI:
:XIV XIV-Stems XIV:
:XV XV-Stems XV:

LEXICON I-II
<n><cl1><sg>:mo
#<n><cl1><sg><abs>:ki>mo>
<n><cl1><pl>:ba
<n><cl1><pl><abs>:ki>ba>
<n><cl1><pl><def>:ba>ba>

LEXICON Ia-II
<n><cl1a><sg>:
<n><cl1a><sg><abs>:ki
<n><cl1a><pl>:ba
<n><cl1a><pl><abs>:ki>ba>
<n><cl1a><pl><def>:ba>ba>

LEXICON III-IV
<n><cl3><sg>:mo
<n><cl3><sg><abs>:ki>mo>
<n><cl3><pl>:mi
<n><cl3><pl><abs>:ki>mi>
<n><cl3><pl><def>:ba>mi>

LEXICON V-VI
<n><cl5><sg>:li
<n><cl5><sg><abs>:ki>li>
<n><cl5><pl>:ma
<n><cl5><pl><abs>:ki>ma>
<n><cl5><pl><def>:ba>ma>

LEXICON VI-Only
<n><cl5><pl>:ma

LEXICON VII-VIII
<n><cl7><sg>:e
<n><cl7><sg><abs>:ki>e>
<n><cl7><pl>:bi
<n><cl7><pl><abs>:ki>bi>
<n><cl7><pl><def>:ba>bi>

LEXICON IX-X
<n><cl9><sg>:
<n><cl9><pl>:ba
<n><cl9><sg><abs>:ki
<n><cl9><pl><abs>:ki>ba>
<n><cl9><pl><def>:ba>ba>

LEXICON IX-X-Var
:{n}

LEXICON XI-VI
<n><cl11><sg>:lo
<n><cl11><sg><abs>:ki>lo>
<n><cl11><sg><inst>:ba>lo>
<n><cl11><pl>:ma
<n><cl11><pl><abs>:ki>ma>
<n><cl11><pl><def>:ba>ma>

LEXICON XIV
<n><cl14><sg>:bo
<n><cl14><sg><abs>:ki>bo>
<n><cl14><sg><inst>:ba>bo>

LEXICON XV
<n><cl15><sg>:ko

LEXICON N1-Suffix
<n><sg>:

#=============================================================================!
#                         Verb Morphotactics                                  !
#=============================================================================!

PATTERN VerbMiddle
Verb-Stems Verb-Suffix Verb-Rad-Ex Verb-Rad-Ex2
Verb-Stems Verb-Suffix-Caus
Aux-Verb-Stems Aux-Verb-Suffix

PATTERN VerbMiddleOrIrreg
VerbMiddle
Verb-Stems-Irregular1 Verb-Suffix

PATTERN VerbMiddleTense
:VerbRef VerbMiddle VerbRef: VerbTense
:VerbRef Verb-Stems-Irregular2 Verb-Irreg2-Suffix VerbRef: VerbTense
VerbFut(1) :VerbRef VerbMiddleOrIrreg VerbRef: VerbFut(2)
VerbFutIntns(1) VerbMiddleOrIrreg VerbFutIntns(2)

PATTERNS
VerbInfImp(1) VerbMiddleOrIrreg VerbInfImp(2)
:VerbPersNum VerbMiddleTense VerbPersNum:

#PATTERNS
#:VerbPersNum :VerbRef VerbMiddle VerbRef: VerbTense VerbPersNum:
#:VerbPersNum VerbFut(1) :VerbRef VerbMiddle VerbRef: VerbFut(2) VerbPersNum:
#:VerbPersNum VerbFutIntns(1) VerbMiddle VerbFutIntns(2) VerbPersNum:
#VerbInfImp(1) VerbMiddle VerbInfImp(2)

#:VerbPersNum :VerbRef Verb-Stems-Irregular2 Verb-Irreg2-Suffix VerbRef: VerbTense VerbPersNum:
#:VerbPersNum VerbFut(1) :VerbRef Verb-Stems-Irregular1 Verb-Suffix VerbRef: VerbFut(2) VerbPersNum:
#:VerbPersNum VerbFutIntns(1) Verb-Stems-Irregular1 Verb-Suffix VerbFutIntns(2) VerbPersNum:
#VerbInfImp(1) Verb-Stems-Irregular1 Verb-Suffix VerbInfImp(2)

LEXICON VerbPersNum
<p1><sg><aa>:na>
<p2><sg><aa>:o>
<p3><sg><aa>:a>
<p3><sg><aa>:ma>
<p3><sg><aa>:bi>
<p3><sg><aa>:mu>
<p3><sg><aa>:li>
<p3><sg><aa>:mo>
<p1><pl><aa>:to>
<p2><pl><aa>:bo>
<p3><pl><aa>:ba>
<p3><sp><nn>:e>

LEXICON VerbInfImp(2)
:ko <inf>:a
:ko <inf><intns>:áká
: <imp>:a
: <imp><intns>:áká

LEXICON VerbFutIntns(2)
:ko <intns><fut>:áká

LEXICON VerbFut(2)
:ko <fut>:a

LEXICON VerbTense
<pres>:{í}
<past>:áká
<dpres>:á
<urp>:ákí

LEXICON VerbRef
<refl>:mí
:

LEXICON Verb-Suffix
<vblex>:

LEXICON Verb-Suffix-Caus
<vblex><caus><rev>:>ol>

LEXICON Verb-Rad-Ex
<appl>:el
<caus>:is
<recip>:an
<rev>:w
<pass>:am
:

ALIAS Verb-Rad-Ex Verb-Rad-Ex2

LEXICON Aux-Verb-Suffix
<vaux>:

LEXICON Verb-Irreg2-Suffix
:

#=============================================================================!
#                         Misc. Morphotactics                                 !
#=============================================================================!

LEXICON Quant-Suffix
<det><qnt>:

LEXICON Prep-Suffix
<pr>:

LEXICON Conj-Coord-Suffix
<cnjcoo>:

LEXICON Conj-Subord-Suffix
<cnjsub>:

LEXICON Conn-Suffix
<conn>:

LEXICON Neg-Suffix
<neg>:

LEXICON AdjInfl
<adj><sg>:mo>
<adj><pl>:mi>
<adj><sg><cl1>:mu>
<adj><sg><cl5>:li>
<adj><sg><cl6>:ma>
<adj><sg><cl7>:e>
<adj><sg><cl8>:bi>

LEXICON Adjective-Invar-Suffix
<adj>:

LEXICON Adverb-Suffix
<adv>:

LEXICON Numeral-Suffix
<num><ord>:
<num><card>:

LEXICON Focus-Suffix
<foc>:

LEXICON Interjection-Suffix
<ij>:


#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

#=============================================================================!
#                               Nouns                                         !
#=============================================================================!

LEXICON I-II-Stems
mobɛ́ti:bɛ́ti     # "Beater, drummer"
motúli:túli     # "Blacksmith"
motóngi:tóngi     # "Tailor, builder"
mokónzi:kónzi     # "King"
monanga:nanga     # "Chief"
moyékoli:yékoli     # "Disciple"
motíkí:tíkí     # "Heir"
molɔ́mí:lɔ́mí     # "Husband"
mosí:sí     # "Habitant"
mosémboli:sémboli     # "Just man"
mobekisi:bekisi     # "Judge, a just man"
mobáli:báli     # "Husband"
motɛ́kisi:tɛ́kisi     # "Merchant"
mobóti:bóti     # "Mother, person who gives birth"
mokilo:kilo     # "Mother-in-law"
mosɛnjí:sɛnjí     # "Native"
molúki:lúki     # "Paddler"
motómbí:tómbí     # "Porter"
mokangámí:kangámí     # "Prisoner"
mokuli:kuli     # "Receiver"
motómí:tómí     # "Sender"
mobateli:bateli     # "Guard, Protector"
mosáli:sáli     # "Labourer, worker"
monyalí:nyalí     # "Sister-in-law"
moómbó:ómbó     # "Slave"
motéyi:téyi     # "Preacher, teacher"
mojímbí:jímbí     # "Trickster"
moboma:boma     # "Victim"
molɔki:lɔki     # "Witch"
mobátísi:bátísi     # "Person who baptises"
mobíkisi:bíkisi     # "Savior"
mokambi:kambi     # "Chief, boss"
mokristo:kristo     # "A Christian"
molakisi:lakisi     # "Teacher"
molóni:lóni     # "Sower"
monguna:nguna     # "Enemy"
moníngá:níngá     # "Friend"
mopǎgánu:pǎgánu     # "Pangan"
mopaya:paya     # "Visitor"
mosántu:sántu     # "Saint"
moto:to     # "Person"
mɔ̌tɔ:tɔ     # Dir/LR
mutu:tu     # "Person"
moúmbu:úmbu     # "Slave"
moyémbi:yémbi     # "Singer"
moyíbi:yíbi     # "Thief"
moyángeli:yángeli     # "Governor"
molɔngɔ́:lɔngɔ́     # "Line, genealogy"
mopiko:piko     # "Heap"
mondúle:ndúle     # "Music, sound"

LEXICON Ia-II-Stems
anjelu     # "Angel"
léki     # "Younger sibling"
kelasi     # "School"
kíti     # "Chair, throne"
kóko     # "Grandparent"
kómbo     # "Broom"
mama     # "Mom"
mbuta-múntu     # "Guard"
mbwá     # "Dog"
ndáko     # "House"
ndeko     # "Sibling"
ndeko\ mwasi     # "Sister"
ngando     # "Crocodile, transport controller"
nganga     # "Expert, magician, healer"
nkísi     # "Amulet, medicine, drug"
nókó     # "Uncle"
nsómí     # "Free person"
ntoma     # "Apostle"
nzói     # "Bee"
profete     # "Prophet"
sángó     # "Priest"
sodá     # "Soldier"
tatá     # "Dad"
zábolo     # "Demon"
sanduku     # "Box"
bugumési     # "Mayor"
sani     # "Plate"
moske     # "Mosque"
wɛnzɛ     # "Outdoor market"
mbísi     # "Fish"
gilípi     # "Flu"
kanton     # "Province"
mumpɛ́     # "Catholic, catholicism"
ewutéli     # "Origin"
ekélami     # "Creation"
ebénéli     # "Functioning"

LEXICON III-IV-Stems
mosisa:sisa     # "Artery, vein"
mozisa:zisa     # "Artery, vein" Dir/RL
moláto:láto     # "Dress"
molangi:langi     # "Bottle"
mokulu:kulu     # "Cable, string"
monzɔ́tɔ:nzɔ́tɔ     # "Star"
monsinga:nsinga     # "Canon"
monyɔlɔ:nyɔlɔ     # "Chain"
molangi:langi     # "Bottle"
motíndo:tíndo     # "Rule, commandment"
mokɔli:kɔli     # "Cord"
motúya:túya     # "Price, cost"
molɔndú:lɔndú     # "Cotton-free"
monkaka:nkaka     # "Crack"
mobóka:bóka     # "Dam"
mombalé:mbalé     # "Debt"
molímó:límó     # "Spirit, soul"
molɔki:lɔki     # "Witch"
monɔkɔ:nɔkɔ     # "Mouth, language, entrance"
mokúka:kúka     # "Drum"
monguna:nguna     # "Enemy"
bolimbisi:limbisi     # "Excuse, pardon"
mosío:sío     # "File"
monsai:nsai     # "Toe"
mosapi:sapi     # "Finger"
moláko:láko     # "Camp"
mololi:loli     # "Flame"
mobóko:bóko     # "Foundation"
mombemba:mbemba     # "Frog"
mombúndo:mbúndo     # "Funnel"
mokwéla:kwéla     # "Heron"
monsoli:nsoli     # "Jackal"
mobémbo:bémbo     # "Trip, travel, journey"
molɔ́ngɔ́:lɔ́ngɔ́     # "Line, row"
mole:le     # "Rafter"
mombuma:mbuma     # "Seed, pill"
mongenzu:ngenzu     # "Tube, pipe"
moswá:swá     # "Ramrod"
mopanzí:panzí     # "Rib, side"
mótɛkɛ     # "Root, flour"
mofuku:fuku     # "Sack"
mosómáni:sómáni     # "Saw"
mombóto:mbóto     # "Seed"
mobɛmbɛ́:bɛmbɛ́     # "Snail"
monzúbɛ:nzúbɛ     # "Thorn"
mombai:mbai     # "Toothpick"
mombóngo:mbóngo     # "Trade"
mongololo:ngololo     # "Trench"
mondule:ndule     # "Trumpet"
monjímbilíkí:njímbilíkí     # "Vine"
monsekeleke:nsekeleke     # "White ant"
mondɛ́lɛ́:ndɛ́lɛ́     # ""
mompé:mpé     # "Wind"
mompɛpɛ:mpɛpɛ     # "Wind" Dir/RL
mɔpɛpɛ:pɛpɛ     # "Wind"
miko:ko     # No singular form
mobali:bali     # "Boy, man, husband"
mobéko:béko     # "Law, command"
mobú:bú     # "Year"
mobúlú:búlú     # "Disorder"
mokandá:kandá     # "Book"
mokano:kano     # "Commitment"
mokapo:kapo     # "Section of law"
mokíla:kíla     # "Tail"
mokili:kili     # "Earth"
mokɔlɔ:kɔlɔ     # "Day"
mokúwa:kúwa     # "Bone"
moléndé:léndé     # "Determination, energy"
molili:lili     # "Nothing, darkness"
molóngó:lóngó     # "World, international community"
molúká:lúká     # "River"
molúlú:lúlú     # "Meet"
mondélé:ndélé     # "White man"
mongóngó:ngóngó     # "Throat, voice, sound"
monyɛlɛ:nyɛlɛ     # "East"
monyókoli:nyókoli     # "Torment"
mosálá:sálá     # "Work, occupation"
mosíká:síká     # "Far away"
mosolo:solo     # "Dowry, money"
motámbo:támbo     # "Trap"
motáné:táné     # "Light color"
motéma:téma     # "Heart, strength of character"
motíndo:tíndo     # "Reason"
motu:tu     # "Head" (can also be motó)
mótuka:tuka     # "Car"
moyíbi:yíbi     # "Theft"
mozindó:zindó     # "Depth"
motuna:tuna     # "Question"
mokakatano:kakatano     # "Challenge, problem"
mosani:sani     # "Athlete"
motango:tango     # "Number, estimate"
monkɔ́lɔ́tɔ́:nkɔ́lɔ́tɔ́     # "Line(geometry)"
mosɔpɔ́:sɔpɔ́     # "Gut, intestine"
mótuka:tuka     # "Car"
